Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-678.01
Withdrawal and transfer of less than 150 acre-feet; notice; metering.

Any person who desires to withdraw and transfer a total of less than one hundred fifty acre-feet of ground water per year from aquifers located in the State of Nebraska for industrial purposes to other property within the state which is owned or leased by such person shall provide written notice to the department and install a water meter or meters that meet the approval of the department. Such notice shall include the amount of the proposed transfer, the point of withdrawal, and the point of delivery and shall be published once each week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the point of withdrawal is located. The withdrawal and transfer may be made without a permit issued under the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act so long as (1) the property which includes the point of withdrawal and the property which includes the point of delivery are owned or leased by the same person, (2) the water is used by such person, and (3) a total of less than one hundred fifty acre-feet of ground water per year is transferred from all sources to the property which includes the point of delivery.

Laws 1993, LB 789, § 8;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 221;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 95.